Oklahoma, session 2026, SB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.7, is
amended to read as follows:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 133 Page 1

Section 1020.7. Any person intending to use groundwater shall
make application apply to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board for an
appropriate permit as provided in Section 1020.11 of this title
before commencing any drilling for such purposes and before taking
water from any completed well heretofore drilled. Such application
to take and use groundwater shall be on a form provided by the Board
and pursuant to the rules and regulations established by the Board.
Any person intending to use groundwater for a medical marijuana grow
facility shall present to the Board a valid medical marijuana
commercial grower license issued by the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana
Authority pursuant to Section 427.14 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes and an Oklahoma Bureau of Narcotics Manufacturer
Registration.
The application heretofore filed with the Board shall be used in
granting permits for existing wells and the Board shall publish the
notice of the hearing thereon.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval."



ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 133 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 23rd day of February,
2026.



Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate














ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 133 Page 3

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 133 By: Burns of the Senate

and

Grego of the House


An Act relating to groundwater permits; amending 82
O.S. 2021, Section 1020.7, which relates to
groundwater permit applications; requiring certain
information with application; providing an effective
date; and declaring an emergency.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1020.7. Any person intending to use groundwater shall
make application apply to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board for an
appropriate permit as provided in Section 1020.11 of this title
before commencing any drilling for such purposes and before taking
water from any completed well heretofore drilled. Such application
to take and use groundwater shall be on a form provided by the Board
and pursuant to the rules and regulations established by the Board,
and shall include documentation that the applicant has a valid,
unexpired driver license issued in this state or a valid United
States passport.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 133 Page 1

The application heretofore filed with the Board shall be used in
granting permits for existing wells and the Board shall publish the
notice of the hearing thereon.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives







ENGR. S. B. NO. 133 Page 2